Hawaii statutes.
§379-4 Penalty. Any person, or agent,
or officer thereof, who violates this chapter is punishable by a fine of not
more than $1,000 or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both. [L 1967, c
18, pt of §2; HRS §379-4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next